el: Απόχρωση γυαλιού: Κεχριμπάρι/Καφέ; Μαύρο; Μπλε; Διάφανο/Διαυγές; Πράσινο; Άλλο
de: Glastönung: Bernstein/Braun; Schwarz; Blau; Transparent/Weißglas; Grün; Sonstige
ro-RO: Nuanță sticlă: Chihlimbar/Maro; Negru; Albastru; Transparent/Incolor; Verde; Altele
nb: Glassfarge: Ravfarget/brun; Svart; Blå; Gjennomsiktig/flint; Grønn; Annet
tr: Cam renk tonu: Kehribar/Kahverengi; Siyah; Mavi; Transparan/Flint; Yeşil; Diğer
fi: Lasin sävytys: Meripihka/ruskea; Musta; Sininen; Kirkas/valkolasi; Vihreä; Muu
ja: ガラスの色: アンバー/ブラウン; 黒; 青; 透明/フリント; 緑; その他
pt-PT: Película para vidro: Âmbar/castanho; Preto; Azul; Transparente/flint; Verde; Outro
it: Tinta del vetro: Ambrato/marrone; Nero; Blu; Trasparente/selce; Verde; Altro
vi: Màu thủy tinh: Hổ phách/Nâu; Màu đen; Màu xanh dương; Trong suốt/Flint; Màu xanh lá cây; Khác
th: สีเคลือบแก้ว: สีอำพัน/สีน้ำตาล; สีดำ; สีน้ำเงิน; โปร่งใส/ฟลินต์; สีเขียว; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Tónovanie skla: Jantárová/hnedá; Čierna; Modrá; Číra/bezfarebná; Zelená; Iné
da: Farvetone i glas: Ravfarvet/brun; Sort; Blå; Gennemsigtig/flint; Grøn; Andet
ko: 유리 착색: 호박색/갈색; 검정색; 파란색; 투명색/플린트; 녹색; 기타
fr: Teinte du verre: Ambré/Brun; Noir; Bleu; Transparent/Flint; Vert; Autre
bg-BG: Оцветяване на стъкло: Кехлибарено/Кафяво; Черно; Синьо; Прозрачно/Кристално; Зелено; Друго
en: Glass tint: Amber/Brown; Black; Blue; Clear/Flint; Green; Other
hr-HR: Nijansa stakla: Jantarna/smeđa; Crna; Plava; Prozirna/flint; Zelena; Ostalo
zh-TW: 玻璃色調: 琥珀色/棕色; 黑色; 藍色; 透明/燧石白; 綠色; 其他
nl: Glas tint: Amber/bruin; Zwart; Blauw; Transparant/flintglas; Groen; Overig
sl-SI: Obarvanje stekla: Jantarna/rjava; Črna; Modra; Prozorna; Zelena; Drugo
ru: Тонировка стекла: Янтарный/коричневый; Черный; Синий; Прозрачный/бесцветный; Зеленый; Другое
pt-BR: Tonalidade do vidro: Âmbar/Marrom; Preto; Azul; Transparente/Flint; Verde; Outro
es: Tinte de vidrio: Ámbar/Marrón; Negro; Azul; Transparente/Sílex; Verde; Otro
lt-LT: Stiklo atspalvis: Gintarinė / ruda; Juoda; Mėlyna; Skaidri / bespalvė; Žalia; Kita
cs: Tónování skla: Jantarové/hnědé; Černé; Modré; Průhledné/flintové; Zelené; Ostatní
zh-CN: 玻璃着色: 琥珀色/棕色; 黑色; 蓝色; 透明/无色; 绿色; 其他
hu: Üveg színezése: Borostyán/barna; Fekete; Kék; Átlátszó/színtelen; Zöld; Egyéb
pl: Przyciemnienie szkła: Bursztynowy / brązowy; Czarny; Niebieski; Przezroczysty / bezbarwny; Zielony; Inny
sv: Glasfärg: Bärnsten/brun; Svart; Blå; Genomskinlig/flinta; Grön; Övrigt